Utah statutes.
11-46-303.   Community cats.

(1)  A cat received by a shelter under the provisions of Section 11-46-103 may be released prior to the five-day holding period to a sponsor that operates a community cat program.

(2)  A community cat is:

(a)  exempt from licensing requirements and feeding bans; and

(b)  eligible for release from an animal shelter prior to the mandatory five-day hold period in Section 11-46-103.

(3)  Community cat sponsors or caretakers do not have custody, as defined in Section 76-9-301, of any cat in a community cat colony.  Cats in a colony that are obviously owned, as evidenced by a collar, tags, microchip, or other discernable owner identification, are not exempt from the provisions of Title 76, Chapter 9, Part 3, Cruelty to Animals.

(4)  Sterilization and vaccination records shall be maintained for a minimum of three years and be available to an animal control officer upon request.

